Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201583-933
Division of Community-Centered Services; Office of Parole Administration; Parole Administrator; duties.

Until July 1, 2016, the Office of Parole Administration shall be within the Division of Community-Centered Services. Beginning July 1, 2016, the Office of Parole Administration shall be within the Board of Parole. Subject to supervision, the Parole Administrator shall be charged with the administration of parole services in the community pursuant to the provisions of section 83-1,102, implementation and administration of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision as it affects parolees, community supervision of sex offenders pursuant to section 83-174.03, and supervision of parolees either paroled in Nebraska and supervised in another state or paroled in another state and supervised in Nebraska, pursuant to the compact.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 79;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 30;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 105;
Laws 2003, LB 46, section 51, provided this section became operative "when thirty-five states have adopted the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision". By June 2002, the compact had reached this threshold. (see www.interstatecompact.org) LB 46 became effective May 24, 2003.
Laws 2015, LB598, § 37.
August 30, 2015
Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, see section 29-2639.